Wisconsin, session 2025, SB626.
do enact as follows:SB626,11Section 1. 114.045 of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (2m) and amended 2to read:SB626,2,83114.045 (2m) (a) No person may operate a drone, as defined in s. 941.292 (1), 4over a correctional institution, as defined in s. 801.02 (7) (a) 1., including any 5grounds of the institution, except that a person may operate a drone over an 6institution that is a state facility with the express authorization of the secretary of 7corrections or his or her designee or over an institution that is a county facility with 8the express authorization of the sheriff of the county or his or her designee.SB626,2,109(b) Any person who violates sub. (1) par. (a) may be required to forfeit not more 10than $5,000.SB626,2,1511(c) A law enforcement officer investigating an alleged violation of sub. (1) par. 12(a) shall seize and transfer to the department of corrections or authority in charge 13of the correctional institution any photograph, motion picture, other visual 14representation, or data that represents a visual image that was created or recorded 15by a drone during an alleged violation of sub. (1) par. (a).SB626,216Section 2. 114.045 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB626,2,1717114.045 (1m) In this section:SB626,2,1818(a) “Drone” has the meaning given in s. 941.292 (1).SB626,2,1919(b) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).SB626,2,2120(c) “Weaponized drone” means a drone that is equipped with a taser, firearm, 21flamethrower, chemical, or explosive device.SB626,322Section 3. 114.045 (2m) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB626,3,21114.045 (2m) (bm) Any person who violates par. (a) by use of a weaponized 2drone, the use of which poses a threat to public safety, is guilty of a Class H felony.SB626,43Section 4. 114.045 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB626,3,64114.045 (3m) (a) A law enforcement officer may do any of the following to 5mitigate the threat posed by a drone that the law enforcement officer reasonably 6suspects poses an imminent threat to public safety:SB626,3,771. Detect, track, and identify the drone.SB626,3,1182. Intercept, disable, or destroy the drone through any lawful method, 9including jamming, hacking, or physically capturing the drone, if the law 10enforcement officer reasonably believes that failure to do so would result in a 11greater threat to public safety than intercepting, disabling, or destroying the drone.SB626,3,1412(b) Neither the law enforcement officer nor the agency that employs them 13shall be financially liable for damage to or loss of a drone that is intercepted, 14disabled, or destroyed under par. (a) 2.SB626,3,1515